Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14G-109.5] Publication of
premium information. (a) Upon the commissioner's request, all managed
care plans shall provide health insurance premium information to the
commissioner within thirty days of the request.

(b) The commissioner shall publish annually,
by electronic or online publication on the official website of the insurance
division, a list of all managed care plans with representative annual premiums
for health insurance. The commissioner shall have information on premiums for
health insurance, which shall be available to the public on request. [L 2014, c
66, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next